Maryland, session 2025, SB0972.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
11–102.
This title applies only in Anne Arundel County.
11–202.
(a) (1) The Governor shall appoint [three] FIVE members to the Board.
(2) The appointments shall be made[:
(i) if the Senate is in session,] with the advice and consent of the
Senate[; or
(ii) if the Senate is not in session, by the Governor alone].
(b) (1) Each member of the Board shall be:
(i) a resident and voter of the county; and
(ii) SELECTED FROM A LIST OF INDIVIDUALS RECOMMENDED
BY THE MEMBERS OF THE ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY HOUSE OR SENATE
DELEGATION TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY; AND
(III) an individual of high character and integrity and of recognized
business capacity.

SENATE BILL 972 3
(2) No more than two THREE members of the Board may belong to the
same political party.
(3) NO MORE THAN TWO MEMBERS OF THE BOARD MAY BE
RESIDENTS OF THE SAME STATE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT.
(4) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT BE APPOINTED TO THE BOARD IF THE
INDIVIDUAL SERVED AS THE CHIEF INSPECTOR WITHIN 5 YEARS 1 YEAR OF THE
DATE THAT THE VACANCY IS PUBLICLY ANNOUNCED.
11–210.
THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT AND PUBLISH A WRITTEN POLICY RELATED TO
CONFLICTS OF INTEREST AND THE RECUSAL OF BOARD MEMBERS FROM BOARD
MATTERS.
11–1409.
(A) THE BOARD SHALL:
(1) INCLUDE ON ALL APPLICATION FORMS FOR THE ISSUANCE OF A
LICENSE OR A LICENSE RENEWAL AN OPTION FOR THE APPLICANT TO PROVIDE THE
APPLICANT’S RACE AND ETHNICITY INFORMATION; AND
(2) ENCOURAGE AN APPLICANT TO PROVIDE RACE AND ETHNICITY
INFORMATION ON THE APPLICATION.
(B) THE BOARD MAY NOT USE ANY RACE OR ETHNICITY INFORMATION
INCLUDED ON AN APPLICATION FOR THE ISSUANCE OF A LICENSE OR LICENSE
RENEWAL AS A FACTOR IN DETERMINING WHETHER TO ISSUE OR RENEW THE
LICENSE.
11–2607.
ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 15 EACH YEAR, THE BOARD SHALL REPORT TO THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, ON THE RACIAL BREAKDOWN OF THE DISCIPLINARY ACTIONS TAKEN BY
THE BOARD IN THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.
11–2802.

SENATE BILL 972
(a) [The Board may impose a fine not exceeding $2,500 or suspend a license or
both for] FOR a violation that is cause for license suspension under the alcoholic beverage
laws affecting the county, THE BOARD MAY:
(1) FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, IMPOSE A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000;
(2) FOR A SECOND OFFENSE IN THE SAME 24–MONTH PERIOD, IMPOSE
A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $2,000 OR SUSPEND THE LICENSE OR BOTH; AND
(3) FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE IN THE SAME 24–MONTH
PERIOD, IMPOSE A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $2,500 OR SUSPEND THE LICENSE OR
BOTH.
(b) A fine or suspension under subsection (a) of this section is in addition to any
term or condition that the Board may impose as a result of the violation.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.